District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
20 act may be cited as the "Poplar Point Economic Development Anchor Disposition Act of 2026".
21 Sec. 2. Definitions.
22 For the purpose of this Act, the term:
23 (1) "Act" means An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the District of
24 Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211; D.C.
25 Official Code§ 10-801 et seq.).
26 (2) "CBE Act" means the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and
27 Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code§ 2-
28 218.01 et seq.).
29 (3) "Certified Business Enterprise" means a business enterprise or joint venture certified
30 pursuant to the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
31 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code§ 2-218.01 et seq.).
1

32 (4) “Developer” means Therme DC LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and its
33 successors, assigns, or affiliates, as approved by the Mayor or permitted under the Transaction
34 Documents.
35 (5) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement governing certain obligations of
36 Developer pursuant to section 4 of the First Source Employment Agreement Act of 1984,
37 effective June 29, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-93; D.C. Official Code § 2-219.03), and Mayor’s Order 83-
38 265 (November 9, 1983), regarding job creation and employment generated as a result of the
39 construction and development of the Property.
40 (6) “Poplar Point” means a parcel of land located along the east side of the Anacostia
41 River and bound by the 11th Street Bridges to the north, the Anacostia Freeway (Interstate 295)
42 and Suitland Parkway to the east and south, respectively, and the Frederick Douglass Memorial
43 Bridge to the west.
44 (6) “Property” means approximately 15 acres real property located at Poplar Point to be
45 defined in the Transaction Documents.
46 (7) “Term Sheet” means the term sheet dated September 17, 2026 executed by Developer
47 and the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development and submitted
48 with this act.
49 (8) “Transaction Documents” mean the agreements between the District and Developer
50 that memorialize the terms of the disposition of the Property, which shall be consistent with the
51 Term Sheet and this act.
52 Sec. 3. Findings.
53 (a) The Property is owned by the United States and is under the jurisdiction of the
54 National Park Service (“NPS”).
2

55 (b) In 2006, Congress enacted the Federal and District of Columbia Government Real
56 Property Act of 2006, approved December 15, 2006 (120 Stat. 2711) (“Federal Act”), directing
57 the National Park Service to transfer Poplar Point to the District upon satisfaction by the District
58 of certain requirements set forth in the Federal Act.
59 (c) On August 22, 2024, the District issued a Request for Expressions of Interest for a
60 Destination Anchor at Poplar Point.
61 (d) Following a competitive and public solicitation process, the Mayor, through the
62 Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, selected Developer’s
63 proposal to develop approximately 15 acres at Poplar Point into a state-of-the-art health and
64 well-being destination to include an approximately 400,000-600,000 square foot health and
65 wellness facility and related amenities (the “Project”).
66 (e) Following the District’s acquisition of the Property pursuant to the Federal Act, the
67 District will lease the Property to Developer to construct and operate the Project pursuant to the
68 Transaction Documents.
69 (f) The method of disposition shall be a ground lease of greater than 15 years, as further
70 described in the Term Sheet submitted with this act.
71 (g) Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement with the District of Columbia
72 Department of Employment Services that shall govern certain obligations of Developer
73 regarding job creation and employment as a result of the design and construction of the Project.
74 (h) Developer shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Small and Local
75 Business Development that shall require Developer to, at a minimum, contract with Certified
76 Business Enterprises for at least 35% of the contract dollar volume with respect to the design and
77 construction of the Project in accordance with the CBE Act.
3

78 (i) Developer shall further comply with the provisions of section 402(a) of the National
79 Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Act of
80 2008, effective March 26, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-138; D.C. Official Code § 2-1226.02(a)), with
81 respect to local, small, and disadvantaged business enterprises and the hiring of District
82 residents.
83 (j) The Transaction Documents for the disposition of the Property shall not be
84 inconsistent with the substantive business terms of the transaction reflected in the Term Sheet, in
85 accordance with section 1(b-1)(2) of the Act, unless revisions to those substantive business terms
86 are approved by the Council in accordance with section 1(b-4) of the Act.
87 Sec. 4. Approval of the disposition of the Property.
88 (a) Notwithstanding the Act, the Mayor is authorized to dispose of the Property, subject
89 to section 3(j) of this act.
90 (b) The authority of the Mayor to dispose of the Property pursuant to this act shall expire
91 10 years after the effective date of this act.
92 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
93 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
94 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
95 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
96 Sec. 6. Effective date.
97 This act shall take effect following approval of the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
98 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
99 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
100 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813, D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02 (c)(1)), and publication in the District of
4

101 Columbia Register.
5

TERM SHEET
THERME-POPLAR POINT
Date September 17, 2026
Seller (Landlord) District of Columbia (the “District”), acting by and through the
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development (“DMPED”).
Buyer (Tenant) Therme DC LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and its
successors, assigns, or affiliates (the “Developer”), as approved by
DMPED or permitted under the agreements between District and
Developer that memorialize the terms of the disposition of the
Property, which shall be consistent with this Term Sheet (the
“Transaction Documents”).
Property An approximately fifteen (15) acre parcel located at Poplar Point as
such parcel will be described in the Transaction Documents.
Transaction All of the terms and conditions of the lease and development of the
Documents Property will be governed by the terms of the Transaction
Documents by and between the District and the Developer.
Method of Disposition The Property will be conveyed by ground lease with a term of sixty
(60) years with one (1) twenty (20) year extension option.
Consideration The annual rent for the Property will be one dollar ($1.00) for the
first twenty (20) years of the lease term (“Initial Rent”). At the
beginning of the twentieth (20th) year of the lease term, the Parties
shall select an appraiser to determine the fair market value of the
Property for purposes of calculating the ground rent to be payable by
Developer commencing with the twenty-first (21st) year of the lease
term (the “Base Ground Rent”). The Base Ground Rent will be
recalculated at the beginning of each of the fiftieth (50th) and sixtieth
(60th) years of the lease term by having the Property reappraised
(each a “Rent Reset”). Commencing with the twenty-sixth (26th)
year of the lease term, the Base Ground Rent shall increase once
every five (5) years thereafter, except in a year when a Rent Reset is
occurring, by the then-current annual Consumer Price Index for the
United States of America (the “Five-Year Rent Adjustment”). In
all events the Five-Year Rent Adjustment shall increase the then
current Base Ground Rent by a minimum of two percent (2.0%) per
year, but not more than three percent (3.0%) per year, with the
applicable annual percentage increases during such five (5) year
period being cumulative but not compounded.
The Project The Developer will construct a state-of-the-art health and well-being
destination to include an approximately 400,000-600,000 square foot
health and wellness facility and related amenities.

Conditions of Closing The District’s obligation to ground lease the Property to the
Developer shall be conditioned on the conditions to closing to be set
forth in the Transaction Documents.
Green Building The Developer shall construct the Project in compliance with the
Requirements Green Building Act of 2006, D.C. Official Code §§ 6-1451.01 et
seq., as amended, and the regulations promulgated therewith.
Schedule of The following contains terms of the Schedule of Performance with
Performance estimated dates, which may be amended and extended with the
approval of DMPED in accordance with the terms of the Transaction
Documents:
• Closing – will occur prior to the expiration of disposition
authority.
• Commencement of Construction of the Project – will occur
within ninety (90) days of the Closing.
• Substantial Completion of the Project – will occur within
sixty (60) months of Commencement of Construction.
• Final Completion of the Project – will occur within twelve
(12) months of Substantial Completion.
Closing Requirements • The Transaction Documents will provide that the Developer
shall execute at Closing a Construction and Use Covenant
and shall be bound to comply with the requirements of the
same for the applicable durations identified therein.
• The Transaction Documents will provide that the Developer
shall deliver to the District at Closing a Development and
Completion Guaranty executed by a guarantor approved by
DMPED.
Certified Business The Developer shall enter into a Certified Business Enterprise
Enterprise Utilization and Participation Agreement with the Department of
Small and Local Business Development governing certain
contracting obligations of the Developer with respect to the design
and construction of the Project under the Small, Local and
Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development and Assistance
Act of 2005, as amended.
First Source The Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement with the
Requirements Department of Employment Services that shall govern obligations of
the Developer pursuant to D.C. Official Code §§ 2-219.03, et seq.,
and Mayor’s Order 83-265 (November 9, 1983) regarding job
creation and employment generated as a result of the design and
construction of the Project.
2

INTENTION AND LIMITATIONS OF THIS TERM SHEET
1. The Developer and DMPED acknowledge that they have prepared and signed this Term
Sheet for the sole purpose of obtaining the approval of the Council of the District of
Columbia (the “Council”) to the proposed transaction. The Developer acknowledges that
DMPED's negotiation of the Transaction Documents and the preparation of this Term
Sheet, DMPED’s signature on this Term Sheet, and submission of this Term Sheet and
supporting documents to the Council shall not bind the District to execute the Transaction
Documents or to convey the Property to the Developer. The Developer further
acknowledges that, notwithstanding Council authorizing the conveyance of the Property,
the District has no obligation to do so absent the District and the Developer duly executing
the Transaction Documents and the satisfaction of the conditions contained therein. In the
event DMPED or the Mayor determine, in their sole and absolute discretion, to withhold
submission of this Term Sheet and supporting documents to the Council or to otherwise
decline to secure Council authorization for the conveyance, DMPED may terminate
negotiations with the Developer and the District shall not be responsible for the
Developer’s costs and expenses incurred in relation to the Property or the Project.
2. The Developer acknowledges that all approvals required of the Council will be granted or
withheld in the sole and absolute discretion of the Council and that, absent Council
approval of the proposed transaction, DMPED has no authority to convey the Property to
the Developer. The Developer acknowledges that it is signing this Term Sheet prior to
obtaining all necessary Council approvals. In the absence of such approvals and execution
of the Transaction Documents, the Developer proceeds at its sole risk and expense with no
recourse whatsoever against the District.
3. The Developer and DMPED agree that upon receipt of all necessary Council approvals,
the Developer and DMPED intend to negotiate the Transaction Documents that will govern
all of the terms and conditions of the conveyance of the Property.
4. Upon the execution of the Transaction Documents, the Developer and DMPED shall
proceed in accordance with the terms of the Transaction Documents; provided, however,
that the Developer and DMPED acknowledge and agree that any substantive change in the
terms set forth in this Term Sheet shall be subject to further Council review and approval
in accordance with the Council act authorizing this transaction.
3

‘The District andthe Developer have caused this Term Sheetto be signed and acknowledged by
theirrespectiveduly authorized representativesas ofthe date identified above.
DISTRICTOF CO LA, by and throughthe Officeof the Deputy
Mayor forPlanni Economic Development
By:
‘NinaAlbert
Deputy MayorforPlanningand Economic Development
THERME DC LLC, aDelaware limitedliability company

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
xk
ATTORNEY GENERAL =m
BRIAN L.SCHWALB
==
COMMERCIALDIVISION
TO: Adele E-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
THROUGH: Charles J. Coughlin Coc
Deputy Attorney General
‘Commercial Division
FROM: Lawrence J. Wolk
Assistant Attorney General
DATE: September 18, 2026
SUBJECT: Therme-Poplar Point Disposition Term Sheet signed and dated September 17, 2026
(the “ 9/17/26 Term Sheet”) by and between the District of Columbia (the “District”) and Therme
DC LLC with respect to the disposition by ground leaseof an approximately fifteen (15) acre parcel
of property located at Poplar Point and to be more specifically identified in the Transaction
Documents (as defined in the 9/17/26 Term Sheet) ( the “Therme Poplar Point Disposition”) to be
disposed underthe bill authorizing the Theme Poplar Point Disposition submitted to Office of the
Attorney General along with the 9/17/26 Term Sheet.
This is to Certify that the Commercial Division of the Office ofthe Attorney General has examined
the 9/17/26 Term Sheet provided by theOfficeof the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development (“DMPED”). Afterdetailed examination of the 9/17/26 Term Sheet, weconclude that
it does not contravene or violate any known legalrequirements, obligations, or commitments of the
District. Accordingly, as provided to us, we discern no reason to determine that the 9/17/26 Term
Sheet is not legally sufficient anditis therefore approved for legal sufficiency.
400 6th Street, NW, Washington, DC 20001 Tel. (202) 724-6658; Lawrence. Wolk@dc.gov

The 9/17/26 Term Sheetrelating to the Therme-Poplar Point Transaction Page 2 of2
This Office has not reviewed any transactional documentation in connection with the Therme
Poplar Point Disposition other than the 9/17/26 Term Sheet, which indicated that the parcel being
disposed of willbe more specifically identified in the Transaction Documents (as defined in the
9/17/Term Sheet). This Office provides no legalopinion about any ofthe transactional documents to
be executed pursuantto the 9/17/26Term Sheet or otherwise in connection with the Therme Poplar
PointDisposition.
If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me at Lawrence.Wolk@dc.gov or 202-
236-4654.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Legal Counsel Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 23, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Poplar Point Economic Development Anchor
Disposition Act of 2026”
(AE-26-386)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri